Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-112
City council; powers; public comfort stations.

In each city of the metropolitan class, the city shall have power by ordinance to erect, establish and maintain public comfort stations. It may locate such public comfort stations on any street, alley, public grounds, or on any lands acquired for such purpose.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. I, § 12, p. 409;

C.S.1922, § 3499;

C.S.1929, § 14-112;

R.S.1943, § 14-112.